Utah statutes.
56-1-25.   Track motor cars -- Installation of head and rear lights, canopies, side curtains, windshield and wiper, and heaters.

(1)  Every person operating or controlling any railroad running through or within the state shall equip each of its track motor cars used during the period from 30 minutes before sunset to 30 minutes after sunrise, with:

(a)  an electric headlight of such construction and with sufficient candle power to render plainly visible at a distance of not less than 300 feet in advance of such track motor car, any track obstruction, landmark, warning sign, or grade crossing;

(b)  a canopy or top of such construction as to adequately protect the occupants of such cars from rain, snow, and inclement weather;

(c)  side curtains;

(d)  a windshield equipped with a windshield wiper device, which must be kept in good working order, with which the operator can clear rain, snow, and other moisture from the windshield; and

(e)  a red rear electric light of such construction and with sufficient candle power to be plainly visible at a distance of 300 feet.

(2)  It is unlawful for any person operating or controlling any railroad running through or within this state to operate or use any track motor car from 30 minutes before sunset to  30 minutes after sunrise, unless the track motor car is equipped with lights of the candle power, construction, and utility described in Subsection (1), a windshield, and a windshield wiper.

(3)  Track motor cars need to be equipped with canopies and side curtains required by Subsection (1) only when requested in writing by a majority of the employees regularly using the cars.  The railroad company shall have not less than 90 days after such request to make the installation required by this section.

(4)  Any person operating or controlling a railroad running through or within the state shall equip its track motor cars with heaters while in use during the time period of November 1 through March 31.



Amended by Chapter 104, 1990 General Session

